Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 18. Transition Provisions

§ 17-19-1801.
Application to existing domestic corporations.

This act applies to all domestic corporations in existence on its effective date that were incorporated under the following statutes of this state: W.S.

17-6-101

through 17-6-117,

17-7-101

through 17-7-116 and

17-9-101

through 17-9-106.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Section 3 of
Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1 of which enacted this chapter (§§

17-19-101

through

17-19-1807

), repealed §§

17-6-101

through 17-6-117,

17-7-101

through
17-7-116,

17-9-101

through 17-9-106,

17-10-120

and 17-16-1804, effective
January 1, 1993.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” as used in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1802.
Application to qualified foreign corporations.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on the effective date of this act is subject to this act but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under this act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1803.
Saving provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the repeal of a statute by this act does not affect:

The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation or liability acquired, accrued or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

Any violation of the statute or any penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal;

Any proceeding, reorganization or dissolution commenced under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed; or

Any meeting of members or directors or action by written consent noticed or any action taken before its repeal as a result of a meeting of members or directors or action by written consent.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by this act is reduced by this act, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Section 3 of
Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1 of which enacted this chapter (§§

17-19-101

through

17-19-1807

), repealed §§

17-6-101

through 17-6-117,

17-7-101

through
17-7-116,

17-9-101

through 17-9-106,

17-10-120

and 17-16-1804, effective
January 1, 1993.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1804.
Public benefit, mutual benefit and religious corporations.

On January 1, 1993 each domestic corporation existing on the effective date of this act that is or becomes subject to this act shall be designated as a public benefit, mutual benefit or religious corporation as follows:

Any corporation designated by statute as a public benefit corporation, a mutual benefit corporation or a religious corporation is the type of corporation designated by statute;

Any corporation that does not come within paragraph (i) of this subsection but is organized primarily or exclusively for religious purposes is a religious corporation;

Any corporation that does not come within paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection but that is recognized as exempt under section 501(c)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code, or any successor section, is a public benefit corporation;

Any corporation that does not come within paragraph (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subsection, but that is organized for a public or charitable purpose and that upon dissolution shall distribute its assets to a public benefit corporation, the United States, a state or a person that is recognized as exempt under section 501(c)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code, or any successor section, is a public benefit corporation; and

Any corporation that does not come within paragraph (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) of this subsection is a mutual benefit corporation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Internal Revenue Code. —

Section 501(c)(iii) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in paragraphs (a)(iii) and (a)(iv), appears as 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1805.
Issuance of additional capital stock prohibited.

As of January 1, 1993, no additional capital stock may be issued by any nonprofit corporation organized prior to January 1, 1993. As of January 1, 1993, persons who were issued capital stock of a nonprofit corporation pursuant to W.S. 17-6-102(a)(viii) shall be considered members, and not stockholders, and shall have the rights, privileges and obligations of members, including rights upon dissolution, as set forth in this act or the corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1806.
Transition of for profit corporations to nonprofit status.

Any corporation as defined by W.S.

17-16-140

and incorporated under the Wyoming Business Corporation Act may become a corporation pursuant to this act by filing amended articles of incorporation complying with this act if:

The corporation is or determines to become upon filing the amended articles of incorporation, a public benefit, mutual benefit or religious corporation;

All shareholders are entitled to the same notice and rights of dissent provided under W.S.

17-16-1320

through

17-16-1331

and notice of any known tax consequences under the Internal Revenue Code;

All shareholders in a business corporation which is or becomes a mutual benefit corporation shall become members entitled to a number of votes, rights to benefits and unequal obligations for assessments and rights upon dissolution in proportion to their number of shares at the time of filing the amended articles of incorporation, unless the amended articles of incorporation provide otherwise;

The transition to nonprofit status shall not impair any obligations or liabilities to others existing at the time of the transition.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, see §

17-16-101

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Internal Revenue Code. —

The federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in paragraph (a)(ii), appears as 26 U.S.C.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1807.
Transition of mutual benefit corporations to for profit status.

Any corporation organized under this chapter which is a mutual benefit corporation may become a corporation organized under the Wyoming Business Corporation Act by filing amended articles of incorporation complying with the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, providing that the corporation shall become a for profit corporation upon filing the amended articles or on a specific date set in the articles if:

The members are entitled to reasonable notice of the impending change;

Any members dissenting from the change are entitled to the benefits dissenting shareholders would be entitled to under W.S.

17-16-1320

through

17-16-1331

in proportion to the members’ rights to assets in the event of dissolution of the corporation;

The transition to for profit status shall not impair the obligation or liability of the corporation to others existing at the time of the transition of the corporation; and

The corporation is not a cooperative utility pursuant to the Wyoming Cooperative Utilities Act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, see §

17-16-101

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.